California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   (AB 292)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18766.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18766.)
-------------------------------------------

18762.

For the purposes of this article, “research” shall include, but not be limited to, expenditures to develop and advance the understanding, techniques, and modalities effective in the care, treatment, and cure of Alzheimer’s victims and their families.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18766.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18766.)
-------------------------------------------

18763.

(a) An individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementia Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, that is established by Section 18764.

(b) The contributions shall be in full
 dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on the joint return.

(c) A designation under subdivision (a) shall be made for any taxable year on the individual return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. In the event that payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the individual’s account, do not exceed the individual’s tax liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the forms of the return to include a space labeled the “Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementia Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted under subdivision (a). The forms shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be
 used to conduct research relating to the cure and treatment of Alzheimer’s disease.

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 299, Sec. 2.   (AB 2400)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18766.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18766.)
-------------------------------------------

18764.

There is in the State Treasury the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementia Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18763. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by individuals in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that individuals have designated
 pursuant to Section 18763 to be transferred to the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementia Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementia Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18763 for payment into that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 299, Sec. 3.   (AB 2400)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18766.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18766.)
-------------------------------------------

18765.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money transferred to the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementia Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(A) To the Franchise Tax Board,
 the Controller, and the State Department of Public Health for reimbursement of all administrative costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board, the Controller, and the State Department of Public Health in connection with their duties under this article.

(B) To the State Department of Public Health to support eligible programs awarded grants under the selection criteria established by the State Department of Public Health’s Alzheimer’s Disease Program (Article 4 (commencing with Section 125275) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code) and for direct program-related expenses.

(2) All moneys allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) may be carried over from the year in which they were received.

(3) Grant moneys shall not be used for any purpose outside this state.

(b) The State Department of Public Health shall comply with the Internet Web site reporting requirements described in Section 18873.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 299, Sec. 4.   (AB 2400)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18766.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18766.)
-------------------------------------------

18766.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain in effect only for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2032, and as of December 1 of that year is repealed.

(b) (1) By September 1, 2019, and by September 1 of each subsequent calendar year that the California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementia Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on a tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be
 received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contributions amount for the calendar year pursuant to paragraph (3). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year. If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the fund is projected to fall below the minimum contribution amount, the Franchise Tax Board shall provide written notification to the State Department of Public Health.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article shall be inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or
 after January 1 of that calendar year and shall be repealed on December 1 of that year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   (AB 2689)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 6, commencing with Section 18761.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Designations to the California Seniors Special Fund [18771. - 18773.]

18771.

(a) Any individual who is allowed the credit under subdivision (c) of Section 17054 may designate on the tax return that a contribution is being made in an amount not to exceed the amount of the credit, without regard to Section 17054.1, which is to be paid to the California Seniors Special Fund.

(b) The contribution may be made individually by each eligible signatory on the joint return who is allowed the credit under subdivision (c) of Section
 17054.

(c) The individual’s return shall be treated as if no designation is made under this article if either of the following apply:

(1) The credit allowed by subdivision (c) of Section 17054 reported on the return is insufficient to cover the amount of the contribution.

(2) Payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s return are insufficient to cover the amount of tax owed plus the contribution.

(d) A designation under subdivision (a) shall be made for any taxable year on the initial return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the forms of the return to allow for
 the designation permitted under subdivision (a).

(f) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18772.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the California Seniors Special Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18771.

The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of the amount of the credits designated pursuant to Section 18771 to be transferred into the California Seniors Special Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Seniors Special Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the credits designated by
 individuals pursuant to Section 18771 for payment into that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18773.

(a) All money transferred to the California Seniors Special Fund pursuant to Section 18771 shall, upon appropriation, be allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) To the California Commission on Aging, the sum of
 eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) in each fiscal year, or the balance of the fund if less than that amount remains for the operational support of the Area Agency on Aging Advisory Council of California (TACC) for its advocacy efforts on behalf of the senior citizens of California.

(3) The balance, if any, to the California Department of Aging for allocation on a per capita basis of individuals 60 years of age or older to the area agencies on aging for the support of direct services to senior citizens, as those services have been identified in each agency’s area plan. Each area agency on aging which elects to receive moneys from the California Seniors Special Fund shall include in their annual report a narrative describing the amount of moneys so received and the purposes for which the money was expended.

(b) All moneys allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be
 carried over from the year in which they were received and encumbered in any following year.

(c) The amount allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be adjusted annually, as determined by the Department of Finance, to reflect changes in salary adjustments, price increases, and travel reimbursement adjustments included for all state agencies in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Designations to the California Breast Cancer Research Fund [18791. - 18796.]

18791.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Breast cancer is a devastating health condition which will affect one out of nine American women during their lifetimes. Every three minutes a woman is diagnosed with breast cancer and every 12 minutes a woman dies of breast cancer. In 1992, 182,000
 women in the United States will be diagnosed with breast cancer and 46,300 will die from the disease. In 1992, nearly 19,000 California women will be diagnosed with breast cancer and 7,000 will die from the disease. Periodic mammography screening has reduced breast cancer mortality by almost 50 percent. Nearly 15 percent of early tumors are not detected on mammograms. Thirty percent of all tumors found on mammograms are missed due to poorly performed or misinterpreted tests. The direct and indirect costs concerning a breast cancer diagnosis exact a huge economic toll of eight billion dollars ($8,000,000,000) a year, with the impact on the health system, the loss of worktime, the loss of women employees and lives lost to a disease that bankrupts families emotionally and economically.

(b) There is no known cause, cure, or prevention at this time for breast cancer. Women are encouraged to screen themselves and be screened for breast cancer.
 According to some studies early detection through mammography reduces the rate of death from breast cancer by 30 to 50 percent. The state of breast cancer screening must be continually improved to identify breast tumors. Current techniques for breast cancer screening include mammography, both film screen and xerography, and ultrasound.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article, to establish a systematic program to conduct research regarding the cause, cure, and prevention of breast cancer. The outcome of this research may have direct effects and consequences on the development of a comprehensive system which may identify the cause, cure, and prevention of breast cancer as well as improving the screening, diagnoses and treatment of victims of breast cancer. This program shall award grants to eligible physicians, hospitals, laboratories, educational institutions, and other organizations and persons for the purpose of
 enabling organizations and persons to conduct research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.    Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18796.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18796.)
-------------------------------------------

18792.

For the purpose of this article, “research” shall include, but not be limited to, expenditures to develop and advance the understanding, techniques, and modalities effective in the prevention, cure, screening, and treatment of breast cancer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.    Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18796.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18796.)
-------------------------------------------

18793.

(a) Any individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the California Breast Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, which is established by Section 18794. This designation is to be used as a voluntary contribution on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on the joint return.

(c) A designation shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. In the event that payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the individual’s account, do not exceed the individual’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the forms of the return to include a space labeled the “California Breast Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted. The forms shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used
 to conduct research relating to the cure, screening, and treatment of breast cancer.

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 427, Sec. 1.   (SB 440)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18796.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18796.)
-------------------------------------------

18794.

There is in the State Treasury the California Breast Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18793. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money which taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18793 to be
 transferred to the California Breast Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Breast Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18793 for payment into that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   (SB 440)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18796.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18796.)
-------------------------------------------

18795.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money transferred to the California Breast Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs
 incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) To the University of California for the support of the Breast Cancer Research Program (Article 1 (commencing with Section 104145) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code) for the purposes stated therein that are related solely to breast cancer research. The University of California may use up to 5 percent of the money allocated to it for administering and promoting the program.

(b) The Legislature requests the University of California to report on its Internet Web site the process for awarding money, the amount of money spent on administration, and an itemization of how program funds were awarded, including, but not limited to, information regarding recipients of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 427, Sec. 3.   (SB 440)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18796.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18796.)
-------------------------------------------

18796.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and is repealed on December 1, 2032.

(b) (1) By September 1, 2018, and by September 1 of each subsequent calendar year that the California Breast Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on a tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall
 determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year pursuant to paragraph (3). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of the contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article is inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year and is repealed on December 1 of that calendar year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty
 thousand dollars ($250,000).

(c) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article before its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately before that repeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 130, Sec. 1.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 8, commencing with Section 18791.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Designations to the California Firefighters’ Memorial Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18801. - 18804.]

18801.

(a) Any individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the California Firefighters’ Memorial Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, which is established by Section 18802. That designation is to be used as a voluntary checkoff on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on the joint return.

(c) A designation shall be made for any taxable year on the initial return for that taxable year, and once made shall be
 irrevocable. In the event that payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made. In the event that no designee is specified, the contribution shall be transferred to the General Fund, after reimbursement of the direct actual costs of the Franchise Tax Board for the collection and the administration of funds under this article.

(d) In the event a taxpayer designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available for designation is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be allocated among the designees on a pro rata basis.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the forms of the return to include a space labeled the
 “California Firefighters’ Memorial Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted. The forms shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to construct and maintain a memorial to California firefighters on the grounds of the State Capitol.

(f) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 173, Sec. 3.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18804.)
-------------------------------------------

18802.

There is in the State Treasury the California Firefighters’ Memorial Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18801. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money which taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18801 to be transferred to the California Firefighters’ Memorial Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Firefighters’ Memorial
 Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18801 for payment into that fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that the 1993 tax return include a space for the California Firefighters’ Memorial Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 173, Sec. 4.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18804.)
-------------------------------------------

18803.

(a) All money transferred to the California Firefighters’ Memorial Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) To the California Fire Foundation.

(b) The money transferred to the California Firefighters’ Memorial
 Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund pursuant to Section 18802, and allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), shall be used for the following purposes:

(1) Maintenance and repair of the California Firefighters’ Memorial on the grounds of the State Capitol.

(2) Ceremonies to honor the memory of fallen firefighters and to assist surviving loved ones, but only from contributions made on tax returns filed on and after January 1, 2004.

(3) An information guide detailing survivor benefits to assist the spouses and children of fallen firefighters, but only from contributions made on tax returns filed on and after January 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 173, Sec. 5.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18804.)
-------------------------------------------

18804.

(a) This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(b) (1) If the repeal date specified in subdivision (a) has been deleted and if, thereafter, in any calendar year the Franchise Tax Board estimates by September 1 that contributions described in this article made on returns filed in that calendar year will be less than the minimum contribution amount prescribed by paragraph (2), then this article is inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on and after January 1 of that calendar year. The Franchise
 Tax Board shall estimate the annual contribution amount by September 1 of each year using the actual amounts known to be contributed and an estimate of the remaining year’s contributions.

(2) For purposes of this section, “minimum contribution amount” means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for any calendar year.

(c) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article prior to its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately prior to that repeal.

(d) The California Fire Foundation shall annually post on its internet website
 information regarding the distribution of the funds in categories consistent with purposes outlined in Section 18803 for the preceding calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 173, Sec. 6.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 9, commencing with Section 18801.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Designations to the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18805. - 18808.]

18805.

(a) A taxpayer may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, which is established by Section 18806. That designation is to be used as a voluntary checkoff on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on the joint return.

(c) A designation shall be made for any taxable year on the initial return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. In the event that payments and
 credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made. In the event that no designee is specified, the contribution shall be transferred to the General Fund, after reimbursement of the direct actual costs of the Franchise Tax Board for the collection and the administration of funds under this article.

(d) In the event a taxpayer designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available for designation is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be allocated among the designees on a pro rata basis.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the forms of the return to include a space labeled the “California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation
 Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted. The forms shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to build and maintain the California Peace Officers’ Memorial in Sacramento, California, and for activities performed by the California Peace Officers Memorial Foundation, Inc. in support of families of slain peace officers.

(f) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 173, Sec. 8.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18808.)
-------------------------------------------

18806.

There is in the State Treasury the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18805. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money which taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18805 to be transferred to the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Peace Officer Memorial
 Foundation
 Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18805 for payment into that fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that the tax return for the 1999 taxable year include a space for the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 173, Sec. 9.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18808.)
-------------------------------------------

18807.

All money transferred to the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be allocated as follows:

(a) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(b) To the Department of the California Highway Patrol for allocation to the California Peace Officers’ Memorial Commission for building and maintaining the California Peace Officers’ Memorial in Sacramento, California, and for activities performed by the
 California Peace Officers Memorial Foundation, Inc. in support of families of slain peace officers.

(c) All money transferred to the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund prior to the enactment of the act adding this subdivision is hereby appropriated for allocation as described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) The California Peace Officers Memorial Foundation, Inc. shall annually post on its internet website information regarding the distribution of the funds in categories consistent with purposes outlined in this section for the preceding calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 173, Sec. 10.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 18808.)
-------------------------------------------

18808.

(a) This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes that date.

(b) If the repeal date specified in subdivision (a) has been deleted, all of the following apply:

(1) By September 1 of the calendar year beginning after the effective date of the act deleting the repeal date and by September 1 of each subsequent calendar year that the California Peace Officer Memorial Foundation Voluntary Tax Contribution
 Fund appears on a tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall do all of the following:

(A) Determine the minimum contribution amount required to be received during the next calendar year for the fund to appear on the tax return for the taxable year that includes that next calendar year.

(B) Provide written notification to the California Peace Officers’ Memorial Commission of the amount determined in subparagraph (A).

(C) Determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount determined by the Franchise Tax Board for the calendar year pursuant to subparagraph (A). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the
 amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article is repealed with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the first calendar year beginning after the effective date of the act that deleted the repeal date specified in subdivision (a), or the minimum contribution amount
 adjusted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) For each calendar year, beginning with calendar year 2005, the Franchise Tax Board shall adjust, on or before September 1 of that calendar year, the minimum contribution amount specified in subdivision (b) as follows:

(1) The minimum contribution amount for the calendar year shall be an amount equal to the product of the minimum contribution amount for the prior calendar year multiplied by the inflation factor adjustment as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041, rounded off to the nearest dollar.

(2) The inflation factor adjustment used for the calendar year shall be based on the figures for the percentage change in the California Consumer Price
 Index received on or before August 1 of the calendar year pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(d) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article prior to its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately prior to that repeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 173, Sec. 11.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed on January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 9.5, commencing with Section 18805.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18851. - 18855.]

18851.

(a) An individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, which is established by Section 18852. That designation is to be used as a voluntary checkoff on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year and once made is irrevocable. If payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s account do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return to include a space labeled the “Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted. The form shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used for the Emergency Food Assistance
 Program.

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 723, Sec. 2.   (SB 61)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2026, as provided in Section 18855.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 18855.)
-------------------------------------------

18852.

There is in the State Treasury the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18851. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18851 to be
 transferred to the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18851 for payment into that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 723, Sec. 3.   (SB 61)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2026, as provided in Section 18855.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 18855.)
-------------------------------------------

18853.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money transferred to the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by
 the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) To the State Department of Social Services for allocation to the Emergency Food Assistance Program. Funds shall be allocated for direct services provided by the Emergency Food Assistance Program and may not be used for the department’s administrative costs.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall report on its Internet Web site the process for awarding money, the amount of money spent on administration, and an itemization of how program funds were awarded, including, but not limited to, information regarding recipients of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 723, Sec. 4.   (SB 61)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2026, as provided in Section 18855.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 18855.)
-------------------------------------------

18854.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this article create an additional funding source for the Emergency Food Assistance Program and shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 818, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2026, as provided in Section 18855.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 18855.)
-------------------------------------------

18855.
